public/third-party/apertium-translations/apertium-spa.spa.metadix
<pardef n="/ser__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>seríamos</l>  <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sería</l>     <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>seríais</l>   <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>serías</l>    <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>serían</l>    <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sería</l>     <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>seremos</l>   <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>seré</l>      <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>seréis</l>    <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>serás</l>     <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>serán</l>     <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>será</l>      <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>fuéremos</l>  <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>fuere</l>     <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>fuereis</l>   <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>fueres</l>    <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>fueren</l>    <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>fuere</l>     <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siendo</l>    <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siéndo</l>    <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantándo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fuimos</l>    <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fui</l>       <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fuisteis</l>  <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fuiste</l>    <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fueron</l>    <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fue</l>       <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>seamos</l>    <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>séamo</l>     <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantémo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>séamos</l>    <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantémos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sed</l>       <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sed</l>       <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><!-- S__cantad' was replaced --><par n="S__haz"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sé</l>        <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantá"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>séd</l>       <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><!-- S__cantád' was replaced --><par n="S__ház"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sé</l>        <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sé</l>        <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cánta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sean</l>      <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>séan</l>      <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantándo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sea</l>       <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>séa</l>       <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantándo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ser</l>       <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ser</l>       <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sér</l>       <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantár"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éramos</l>    <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>era</l>       <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erais</l>     <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eras</l>      <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eran</l>      <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>era</l>       <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fuéramos</l>  <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>fuésemos</l>  <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fuera</l>     <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>fuese</l>     <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fuerais</l>   <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>fueseis</l>   <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fueras</l>    <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>fueses</l>    <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fueran</l>    <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>fuesen</l>    <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fuera</l>     <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>fuese</l>     <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sido</l>      <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>somos</l>     <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>soy</l>       <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sois</l>      <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eres</l>      <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>son</l>       <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>seamos</l>    <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sea</l>       <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>seáis</l>     <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>seas</l>      <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sean</l>      <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e lm="sea"><p><l>sea</l>     <r>ser<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="ser pan comido">  <par n="/ser__vblex"/><p><l><b/>pan<b/>comido</l><r><g><b/>pan<b/>comido</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="ser duro de entendederas"><i></i><par n="/ser__vblex"/><p><l><b/>duro<b/>de<b/>entendederas</l><r><g><b/>duro<b/>de<b/>entendederas</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="ser un potosí">   <i></i><par n="/ser__vblex"/><p><l><b/>un<b/>potosí</l><r><g><b/>un<b/>potosí</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="ser un chinche">  <i></i><par n="/ser__vblex"/><p><l><b/>un<b/>chinche</l><r><g><b/>un<b/>chinche</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="ser la irrisión de todo el mundo"><i></i><par n="/ser__vblex"/><p><l><b/>la<b/>irrisión<b/>de<b/>todo<b/>el<b/>mundo</l><r><g><b/>la<b/>irrisión<b/>de<b/>todo<b/>el<b/>mundo</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="ser menester">    <par n="/ser__vblex"/><p><l><b/>menester</l><r><g><b/>menester</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="ser el incitador" a="albertonl">   <i></i><par n="/ser__vblex"/><p><l><b/>el<b/>incitador</l><r><g><b/>el<b/>incitador</g></r></p></e>
